District of Columbia statutes.
21-904

Admission upon written application; right of release.

A person in a place specified by section 21-902 may, upon his written application, be admitted for observation and diagnosis to Saint Elizabeths Hospital in the discretion of the Superintendent of the hospital for a period not exceeding 30 days. If, after admission to Saint Elizabeths Hospital, he expresses a desire for release from the hospital, he shall be released within 72 hours thereafter, unless proceedings for his adjudication as a person with a mental illness have been instituted as provided for by section 21-906 .

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 764, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-169, § 21(d)(5), 59 DCR 5567
This section is referenced in § 21-903, § 21-906, and § 21-909.
1981 Ed., § 21-904.
1973 Ed., § 21-904.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-169 substituted “person with mental illness” for “mentally ill person” in the second sentence
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-169 substituted “person with mental illness” for “mentally ill person” in the second sentence

Section 35 of D.C. Law 19-169 provided that no provision of the act shall impair any right or obligation existing under law.

Section 35 of D.C. Law 19-169 provided that no provision of the act shall impair any right or obligation existing under law.